Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.070

Compliance with goals—Bidding procedures.

It is the intent of this chapter that the goals established under this chapter for participation by minority and women-owned and controlled businesses be achievable. If necessary to accomplish this intent, contracts may be awarded to the next lowest responsible bidder in turn, or all bids may be rejected and new bids obtained, if the lowest responsible bidder does not meet the goals established for a particular contract under this chapter. The dollar value of the total contract used for the calculation of the specific contract goal may be increased or decreased to reflect executed change orders. An apparent low-bidder must be in compliance with the contract provisions required under this chapter as a condition precedent to the granting of a notice of award by any state agency or educational institution.

[ 1994 c 15 s 1; 1987 c 328 s 4; 1983 c 120 s 7.]